Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $7,386,826 for homelessness prevention services
delivered through the Oregon Eviction Diversion and Prevention and Eviction  Prevention
Rapid Response programs.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $26,213,174 for homelessness prevention
services delivered through the  Oregon Eviction Diversion and Prevention and Eviction Pre-
vention Rapid Response programs.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing  and Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $200,000 for the development and design of a
statewide, long-term rent assistance program for individuals who are  rehoused with state
investments made by sections 4 and 5 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing  and Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2023, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $20,900,000 to increase shelter capacity and
connections to shelter, support rapid rehousing  initiatives, provide capacity support for cul-
turally responsive organizations and provide sanitation services for communities in desig-
nated homelessness emergency areas, based on local plans submitted to the department.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community  Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $64,300,000 to increase shelter capacity  and
connections to shelter, support rapid rehousing initiatives,  provide capacity support for cul-
turally responsive organizations and provide sanitation services for communities in desig-
nated homelessness emergency areas, based on local plans submitted to the department.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000 to provide support  to members of
federally recognized Indian tribes in Oregon experiencing homelessness.
Enrolled House Bill 5019 (HB 5019-A) Page 1
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June 30,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,125,824 for the administration of
homelessness prevention programs  and local plans addressing unsheltered homelessness in
designated homelessness emergency areas.
SECTION 8.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community  Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $1,145,303 for the administration of
homelessness prevention programs  and local plans addressing unsheltered homelessness in
designated homelessness emergency areas.
SECTION 9. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management, for the biennium ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $923,925 for the coordination of efforts to
address homelessness in designated homelessness emergency areas as part of  the activation
of the State of Oregon Emergency Operations Plan.
SECTION 10. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Emergency  Management, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $722,631 for the coordination of efforts
to address homelessness in designated homelessness  emergency areas as part of the acti-
vation of the State of Oregon Emergency Operations Plan.
SECTION 11. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $26,135,000 to increase shelter capacity
and connections to shelter,  support rapid rehousing initiatives, provide capacity support for
culturally responsive  organizations and provide sanitation services for communities within
the OR-505 - Oregon Balance of State Continuum of Care.
SECTION 12. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,250,000  for the administration of
support provided to address homelessness in communities within the OR-505 - Oregon Bal-
ance of State Continuum of Care.
SECTION 13. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $5,000,000 for deposit into the Emer-
gency Housing Account created  under ORS 458.620, for the purpose of providing services and
assistance to school-aged children  enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12 who are
homeless or at risk of becoming homeless, or their families.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by  the Housing and Community Services Department from the Emer-
gency Housing Account created under ORS 458.620 for the purpose of providing services and
assistance to school-aged children  enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12 who are
homeless or at risk of becoming homeless, or their families.
SECTION 15.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $200,854, for administration  of the pro-
vision of services and assistance to school-aged children enrolled  in kindergarten through
grade 12 who are homeless or at risk of becoming homeless, or their families.
SECTION 16. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human  Services, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the  amount of $12,500,000 for the purpose of awarding grants to in-
crease access  by youth experiencing homelessness to shelter facilities, outreach, culturally
Enrolled House Bill 5019 (HB 5019-A) Page 2
specific services and mental health or substance  abuse services and to strengthen partner-
ships with host home programs and other transitional housing options.
SECTION 17. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the  amount of $6,250,000 for the purpose of providing two-year grants
to organizations operating host home projects to establish, continue or expand operation of
host home projects for youth experiencing homelessness.
SECTION 18.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the  amount of $1,171,469, for the administration of programs and ser-
vices for youth experiencing homelessness.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and Community Services Department by  section 229, chapter 669,
Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for distributions to compensate
landlords for unpaid rent payments pursuant to sections 12  and 13, chapter 420, Oregon Laws
2021, is decreased by $16,623,741.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Housing and Community Services  Department by section 1, chapter 556, Oregon
Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, is decreased by $14,000,000.
SECTION 21. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 15, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5019 (HB 5019-A) Page 3